Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-22] Unavailability of specified
privileges. The following privileges shall not be available to exclude
evidence of imminent harm, harm, or threatened harm in any proceeding under
this chapter:

(1) The physician-patient privilege;

(2) The psychologist-client privilege;

(3) The spousal privilege; and

(4) The victim-counselor privilege. [L 2010, c 135,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next